Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 5 Review and Termination of Guardianship

29-4-40.
Inquiry into unjust denial of rights or privileges of ward.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may conduct a judicial inquiry into whether the ward is being denied a right or privilege provided for by this chapter and may issue appropriate orders. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the inquiry be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the guardian, the ward’s legal counsel, if any, and the ward’s conservator, if any. The court, in its discretion, may appoint legal counsel for the ward or a guardian ad litem, or both.

No petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied a right or privilege provided for by this chapter shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied substantially the same right or privilege unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-41.
Modification of guardianship.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may modify the guardianship by adjusting the duties or powers of the guardian, as defined in Code Sections 29-4-22 and 29-4-23, or the powers of the ward, as defined in Code Sections 29-4-20 and 29-4-21, or by making other appropriate adjustments to reflect the extent of the current capacity of the ward or other circumstances of the guardianship. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the petition be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the guardian, the ward’s legal counsel, and the ward’s conservator, if any. In any proceeding under this Code section that would expand or increase the powers of the guardian or further restrict the rights of the ward, the court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward. In all other cases, the court, in its discretion, may appoint legal counsel for the ward or a guardian ad litem, or both.

If the petition for modification alleges a significant change in the capacity of the ward, it must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with notice as the court deems appropriate.

If the petition for modification does not allege a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court in its discretion may modify the guardianship upon a showing that the modification is in the ward’s best interest; provided, however, that the court may order compliance with any of the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section prior to granting the petition for modification.

In any proceeding under this Code section that would expand or increase the powers of the guardian or further restrict the powers of the ward, the burden is on the petitioner to show by clear and convincing evidence that the modification is in the ward’s best interest. In any proceeding under this Code section that would restrict the powers of the guardian or restore powers to the ward, the burden is on the petitioner to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the modification is in the ward’s best interest.

No petition for modification shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition for substantially the same modification unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 1/SB 134.

29-4-42.
Termination of guardianship; required evidence; burden of proof; return of property.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, and upon a proper showing that the need for a guardianship is ended, the court may terminate the guardianship and restore all personal and property rights to the ward. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the petition be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the guardian, the ward’s legal counsel, if any, and the ward’s conservator, if any. The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and may, in its discretion, appoint a guardian ad litem.

A petition for termination must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the guardianship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-4-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that the guardianship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with such notice as the court deems appropriate.

In any proceeding under this Code section, the burden is on the petitioner to show by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no longer a need for the guardianship.

No petition for termination of a guardianship shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition for termination of the guardianship unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

The death of the ward automatically terminates the guardianship, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 29-4-43.

Upon termination of the guardianship, the guardian shall deliver any money or property to the ward or, if a conservator has been appointed for the ward, to that conservator or, if the ward is deceased, to the ward’s personal representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-43.
Petition of guardian for dismissal; order of dismissal.

Upon the termination of the guardianship or the resignation of the guardian, the guardian may petition the court for an order dismissing the guardian from office. The petition shall include a final status report to the court which covers the period of time from the latest annual status report filed by the guardian. The final status report shall contain the information required for annual status reports and shall otherwise comply with the provisions of Code Section 29-4-22. Notice shall be published one time in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is filed and shall state that any objection must be made in writing and shall designate the date on or before which objections must be filed in the court, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of publication. The court shall examine any objections filed.

If no objection is filed or if, upon hearing any objection, the court is satisfied that the order dismissing the guardian from office is appropriate, the court shall enter an order dismissing the guardian from office. An order dismissing the guardian shall not bar an action against the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.